nb: Stroppekonfigurasjon: 2-punkts; 3-punkts; 4-punkts; 5-punkts; 6-punkts; Annet
hu: Pántkonfiguráció: 2 pontos; 3 pontos; 4 pontos; 5 pontos; 6 pontos; Egyéb
zh-CN: 绑带配置: 2 点式; 3 点式; 4 点式; 5 点式; 6 点式; 其他
ru: Конфигурация ремня: 2-точечная; 3-точечная; 4-точечная; 5-точечная; 6-точечная; Другое
fi: Hihnakokoonpano: 2-piste; 3-piste; 4-piste; 5-piste; 6-piste; Muu
fr: Configuration de la sangle: À 2 points; À 3 points; À 4 points; À 5 points; À 6 points; Autre
it: Configurazione del cinturino: A 2 punti; A 3 punti; A 4 punti; A 5 punti; A 6 punti; Altro
th: การกำหนดค่าสายรัด: แบบ 2 จุด; แบบ 3 จุด; แบบ 4 จุด; แบบ 5 จุด; แบบ 6 จุด; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 綁帶配置: 2 點式; 3 點式; 4 點式; 5 點式; 6 點式; 其他
ro-RO: Configurația curelei: În 2 puncte; În 3 puncte; În 4 puncte; În 5 puncte; În 6 puncte; Altele
ja: ストラップ構成: 2点式; 3点式; 4点式; 5点式; 6点式; その他
sl-SI: Konfiguracija traku: 2-točkovno; 3-točkovno; 4-točkovno; 5-točkovno; 6-točkovno; Drugo
sk-SK: Konfigurácia popruhu: 2-bodový; 3-bodový; 4-bodový; 5-bodový; 6-bodový; Iné
vi: Cấu hình dây đeo: 2 điểm; 3 điểm; 4 điểm; 5 điểm; 6 điểm; Khác
de: Gurtkonfiguration: 2-Punkt; 3-Punkt; 4-Punkt; 5-Punkt; 6-Punkt; Andere
pt-BR: Tira configuração: 2 pontos; 3 pontos; 4 pontos; 5 pontos; 6 pontos; Outro
da: Remkonfiguration: 2-punkt; 3-punkt; 4-punkt; 5-punkt; 6-punkt; Andet
bg-BG: Конфигурация на ремъка: 2-точков; 3-точков; 4-точков; 5-точков; 6-точков; Друго
pt-PT: Configuração da correia: 2 pontos; 3 pontos; 4 pontos; 5 pontos; 6 pontos; Outro
hr-HR: Konfiguracija remena: 2 točke; 3 točke; 4 točke; 5 točaka; 6 točaka; Ostalo
lt-LT: Diržo konfigūracija: 2 taškų; 3 taškų; 4 taškų; 5 taškų; 6 taškų; Kita
nl: Band configuratie: 2-punts; 3-punts; 4-punts; 5-punts; 6-punts; Overig
tr: Kayış yapılandırması: 2 noktalı; 3 noktalı; 4 noktalı; 5 noktalı; 6 noktalı; Diğer
ko: 스트랩 구성: 2점식; 3점식; 4점식; 5점식; 6점식; 기타
sv: Remkonstruktion: 2-punkts; 3-punkts; 4-punkts; 5-punkts; 6-punkts; Övrigt
pl: Konfiguracja paska: 2-punktowy; 3-punktowy; 4-punktowy; 5-punktowy; 6-punktowy; Inna
es: Configuración de la correa: 2 puntos; 3 puntos; 4 puntos; 5 puntos; 6 puntos; Otro
en: Strap configuration: 2-point; 3-point; 4-point; 5-point; 6-point; Other
el: Διαμόρφωση ιμάντα: 2 σημείων; 3 σημείων; 4 σημείων; 5 σημείων; 6 σημείων; Άλλο
cs: Konfigurace popruhu: 2bodová; 3bodová; 4bodová; 5bodová; 6bodová; Jiné